Arkansas, session 2025, HB1166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-707 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-707. Prescription asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine —
Definitions.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as “Alex's Law”.
(b) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Epinephrine" means a neurotransmitter and a hormone that
has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the
treatment of anaphylaxis.
(B) "Epinephrine" only includes auto-injectable
epinephrine and epinephrine nasal spray;
(1)(A)(2)(A) “Medication” means a drug as that term is defined
in 21 U.S.C. § 321(g) of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act as in
existence on January 1, 2005.
(B) “Medication” includes inhaled bronchodilators and
auto-injectable epinephrine; and
(2)(3) “Self-administration” means a person's discretionary use
*JMB026*
02-13-2025 10:18:22 JMB026

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/13/25 HB1166
of a medication pursuant to a prescription or written direction from a
licensed healthcare practitioner.
(c)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
develop guidelines for use in school districts that allow a student to carry
and use an asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, while in
school, at an on-site school-sponsored activity, or at an off-site school-
sponsored activity.
(2)(A) The procedure shall include at a minimum the following
provisions:
(i) The parent or guardian of a student who needs to
carry an asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, shall
provide the school with written authorization for the student to carry an
asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, on his or her person
for use while in school, at an on-site school-sponsored activity, or at an
off-site school-sponsored activity; and
(ii) The authorization shall be:
(a) Valid valid only for the duration of the
school year at the school that the student is attending at the time the
authorization is provided.; and
(b) Renewed The authorization must be renewed
for each school year or if the student changes schools in order for the
student to carry an asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both,
on his or her person.
(B) The parent or guardian of a student who needs to carry
an asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, shall provide the
school with appropriate medical documentation, which shall include:
(i) Evidence that the asthma inhaler or auto-
injectable epinephrine, or both, have been prescribed by a healthcare
practitioner with prescriptive privileges;
(ii) Evidence that the student needs to carry the
asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, on his or her person
due to a medical condition; and
(iii) A copy of an individualized healthcare plan
for the student.
(C) All medical documentation provided with regard to a
student who carries an asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or
02-13-2025 10:18:22 JMB026

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/13/25 HB1166
both, shall be kept on file at the school the student attends in a location
that is readily accessible in the event of an asthma or anaphylaxis
emergency.
(D) A student's asthma inhaler or auto-injectable
epinephrine, or both, shall be supplied by the student's parent or guardian
and shall be stored and transported in its original prescription-labeled
container.
(E) The student shall demonstrate to the healthcare
practitioner who wrote the prescription and the school nurse, if the school
nurse is available, the skill level and responsibility necessary to use and
administer the asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both.
(F)(i) A student with asthma is not required by this
section or any related rule or school procedure to carry the student's asthma
inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, on his or her person.
(ii) If a student with asthma does not carry the
student's asthma inhaler or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, on his or
her person, then the student's parent or guardian shall provide the school
with appropriate medication in the event of an asthma or anaphylaxis
emergency, which shall be immediately available to the student in an
emergency.
(G) A student who carries the student's asthma inhaler or
auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, on his or her person may provide the
school with appropriate medication in the event of an asthma or anaphylaxis
emergency, which shall be immediately available to the student in an
emergency.
(H) A student is prohibited from sharing, transferring, or
in any way diverting his or her own medications to any other person.
(d)(1) A school district, school district employee, or agent of a
school district is not liable for injury to a student caused by his or her
use of a prescription inhaler or self-administration of medication.
(2)(A) Regardless of whether or not a student's parents have
signed a waiver of liability, when a school nurse or a school district or
public charter school employee who holds a certificate under subsection (f)
of this section administers an epinephrine auto-injector to a student whom
the school nurse or a school district or public charter school employee in
good faith professionally believes is having an anaphylactic reaction or when
02-13-2025 10:18:22 JMB026

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/13/25 HB1166
a school nurse or a school district or public charter school employee
administers albuterol to a student who the school nurse or a school district
or public charter school employee in good faith professionally believes is in
perceived respiratory distress, the following persons are immune from any
damage, loss, or liability as a result of an injury arising from the
administration of an epinephrine auto-injector or albuterol:
(i) The school district or public charter school;
(ii) The employees and agents of the school district
or public charter school; and
(iii) A physician providing a standing protocol or
prescription for epinephrine auto-injectors or albuterol maintained at a
school.
(B) This subdivision (d)(2) does not provide immunity from
suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of a person in administering an
epinephrine auto-injector or albuterol to a student under this section.
(e)(1) A school district or public charter school shall adopt a policy
to authorize a school nurse or a school district or public charter school
employee to:
(A) Provide an epinephrine auto-injector or albuterol to a
student that meets the prescription on file or any personnel who holds a
certificate under subsections (f) and (g) of this section to administer an
epinephrine auto-injector or albuterol to the student;
(B) Administer an epinephrine auto-injector or albuterol
that meets the prescription on file to a student who has an individualized
healthcare plan that authorizes the use of an epinephrine auto-injector or
albuterol;
(C) Administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a student
who the school nurse or a school district or public charter school employee
who holds a certificate under subsection (f) of this section in good faith
professionally believes is having an anaphylactic reaction; and
(D) Administer albuterol to a student who the school nurse
or a school district or public charter school employee in good faith
professionally believes is in perceived respiratory distress.
(2) A school nurse shall administer an epinephrine auto-injector
or albuterol under a standing protocol from a physician licensed to practice
02-13-2025 10:18:22 JMB026

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/13/25 HB1166
medicine in this state.
(3) A school nurse who receives a supply of epinephrine auto-
injectors under § 20-13-405 for use at a public school shall maintain the
supply of epinephrine auto-injectors at the school in a locked, secure
location.
(4) Each school district and public charter school shall develop
a health plan to implement a certificate from a licensed physician, an
advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant under
subsections (f) and (g) of this section.
(f)(1) A licensed physician shall issue a certificate under the Insect
Sting and Other Allergic Reactions Emergency Treatment Act, § 20-13-401 et
seq., authorizing a school nurse or a school district or public charter
school employee who is trained in the administration of epinephrine to
possess and administer epinephrine.
(2) The certificate shall specify the circumstances under which
epinephrine may be administered.
(g)(1) A physician who is licensed to practice medicine in this state,
an advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant may issue a
certificate authorizing a school nurse or a school district or public charter
school employee who is trained in the administration of albuterol to possess
and administer albuterol.
(2) A school district or public charter school may:
(A) Acquire and stock a supply of albuterol as authorized
by subdivision (g)(1) of this section; and
(B) Enter into agreements with manufacturers of albuterol
to obtain the albuterol free of charge or at fair market or reduced prices.
(3) A school district or public charter school shall designate
an employee trained in the possession and administration of albuterol to be
responsible for the storage, maintenance, and distribution of albuterol
stocked by the school.

/s/Gramlich




02-13-2025 10:18:22 JMB026